Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.193.010

Operation of program by school district or educational service district.

Any school district or educational service district may operate all or any portion of an education program for juveniles in accordance with this chapter, notwithstanding the fact the services or benefits provided extend beyond the geographic boundaries of the school district or educational service district providing the service.

[ 1998 c 244 s 2.]